Nevada, session 83, AB34.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 202.876 is hereby amended to read as follows:
202.876 “Violent or sexual offense” means any act that, if
prosecuted in this State, would constitute any of the following
offenses:
1. Murder or voluntary manslaughter pursuant to NRS 200.010
to 200.260, inclusive.
2. Mayhem pursuant to NRS 200.280.
3. Kidnapping pursuant to NRS 200.310 to 200.340, inclusive.
4. Sexual assault pursuant to NRS 200.366.
5. Robbery pursuant to NRS 200.380.
6. Administering poison or another noxious or destructive
substance or liquid with intent to cause death pursuant to
NRS 200.390.
7. Battery with intent to commit a crime pursuant to
NRS 200.400.
8. Administering a drug or controlled substance to another
person with the intent to enable or assist the commission of a felony
or crime of violence pursuant to NRS 200.405 or 200.408.
9. False imprisonment pursuant to NRS 200.460 if the false
imprisonment involves the use or threatened use of force or violence
against the victim or the use or threatened use of a firearm or a
deadly weapon.
10. Assault with a deadly weapon pursuant to NRS 200.471.
11. Battery which is committed with the use of a deadly
weapon or which results in substantial bodily harm as described in
NRS 200.481 or battery which is committed by strangulation as
described in NRS 200.481 or 200.485.
12. An offense involving pornography and a minor pursuant to
NRS 200.710 [or 200.720.] to 200.730, inclusive.
13. Open or gross lewdness pursuant to NRS 201.210.
14. Lewdness with a child pursuant to NRS 201.230.
15. An offense involving pandering or sex trafficking in
violation of NRS 201.300, prostitution in violation of NRS 201.320
or advancing prostitution in violation of NRS 201.395.
16. Sexual conduct between certain employees of a school or
volunteers at a school and a pupil pursuant to NRS 201.540.
17. Sexual conduct between certain employees of a college or
university and a student pursuant to NRS 201.550.
18. Sexual conduct between certain employees or contractors
of or volunteers for an entity which provides services to children
and a person under the care, custody, control or supervision of the
entity pursuant to NRS 201.555.
-
*AB34_R1*

– 3 –
19. Luring a child or a person with a mental illness pursuant
to NRS 201.560.
20. Coercion pursuant to NRS 207.190, if the coercion
involves the use or threatened use of force or violence against the
victim or the use or threatened use of a firearm or a deadly weapon.
[17.] 21. An attempt, conspiracy or solicitation to commit an
offense listed in this section.
Sec. 2. NRS 176A.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
176A.110 1. The court shall not grant probation to or
suspend the sentence of a person convicted of an offense listed in
subsection 3 unless:
(a) If a psychosexual evaluation of the person is required
pursuant to NRS 176.139, the person who conducts the
psychosexual evaluation certifies in the report prepared pursuant to
NRS 176.139 that the person convicted of the offense does not
represent a high risk to reoffend based upon a currently accepted
standard of assessment; or
(b) If a psychosexual evaluation of the person is not required
pursuant to NRS 176.139, a psychologist licensed to practice in this
State who is trained to conduct psychosexual evaluations or a
psychiatrist licensed to practice medicine in this State who is
certified by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology, Inc.,
and is trained to conduct psychosexual evaluations certifies in a
written report to the court that the person convicted of the offense
does not represent a high risk to reoffend based upon a currently
accepted standard of assessment.
2. This section does not create a right in any person to be
certified or to continue to be certified. No person may bring a cause
of action against the State, its political subdivisions, or the agencies,
boards, commissions, departments, officers or employees of the
State or its political subdivisions for not certifying a person pursuant
to this section or for refusing to consider a person for certification
pursuant to this section.
3. The provisions of this section apply to a person convicted of
any of the following offenses:
(a) Attempted sexual assault of a person who is 16 years of age
or older pursuant to NRS 200.366.
(b) Statutory sexual seduction pursuant to NRS 200.368.
(c) Battery with intent to commit sexual assault pursuant to
NRS 200.400.
(d) Abuse or neglect of a child pursuant to NRS 200.508.
(e) An offense involving pornography and a minor pursuant to
NRS 200.710 to 200.730, inclusive.
(f) Fertility fraud pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of
NRS 200.975.
-
*AB34_R1*

– 4 –
(g) Incest pursuant to NRS 201.180.
(h) Open or gross lewdness pursuant to NRS 201.210.
(i) Indecent or obscene exposure pursuant to NRS 201.220.
(j) Soliciting a child for prostitution pursuant to NRS 201.354.
(k) Sexual penetration of a dead human body pursuant to
NRS 201.450.
(l) Sexual conduct between certain employees of a school or
volunteers at a school and a pupil pursuant to NRS 201.540.
(m) Sexual conduct between certain employees of a college or
university and a student pursuant to NRS 201.550.
(n) Luring a child or a person with mental illness pursuant to
NRS 201.560, if punished as a felony.
(o) A violation of NRS 207.180.
(p) An attempt to commit an offense listed in paragraphs (b) to
(o), inclusive.
(q) An attempt to commit a violation of NRS 201.230.
(r) Coercion or attempted coercion that is determined to be
sexually motivated pursuant to NRS 207.193.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*AB34_R1*